Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
704

PENAL
RESPONSIBILITY AND FITNESS TO PROCEED

Section

704-400 Physical or mental disease, disorder, or
defect

excluding penal responsibility

704-401 Evidence of physical or mental disease,
disorder, or

defect admissible when relevant to state
of mind

704-402 Physical or mental disease, disorder, or
defect

excluding responsibility is an
affirmative defense;

form of verdict and judgment when
finding of

irresponsibility is made

704-403 Physical or mental disease, disorder, or
defect

excluding fitness to proceed

704-404 Examination of defendant with respect to
physical or

mental disease, disorder, or defect excluding

fitness to proceed

704-405 Determination of fitness to proceed

704-406 Effect of finding of unfitness to
proceed and

regained fitness to proceed

704-407 Special hearing following commitment or
release on

conditions

704-407.5 Examination of defendant with respect to
physical or

mental disease, disorder, or defect
excluding penal

responsibility

704-408 Determination of irresponsibility

704-409 Access to defendant by examiners of
defendant's

choice

704-410 Form of expert testimony regarding
physical or

mental disease, disorder, or defect

704-410.5 Conditional release; duration limited in
nonfelony

cases

704-411 Legal effect of acquittal on the ground
of physical

or mental disease, disorder, or defect
excluding

responsibility; commitment; conditional
release;

discharge; procedure for separate
post-acquittal

hearing

704-412 Committed person; application for
conditional

release or discharge; by the director of
health; by

the person

704-413 Conditional release; application for
modification or

discharge; termination of conditional
release and

commitment

704-414 Procedure upon application for
discharge,

conditional release, or modification of
conditions

of release

704-415 Disposition of application for
discharge,

conditional release, or modification of
conditions

of release

704-416 Statements for purposes of examination
or treatment

inadmissible except on issue of physical
or mental

condition

704-416.5 Supervision of person on conditional
release

704-417 Use of out-of-state institutions

704-418 Immaturity excluding penal conviction;
transfer of

proceedings to family court

704-419 Repealed

704-420 Examination reports; provided to
director of health

Note

L 2001, c 91, §4 purports to amend this chapter.

Law Journals and Reviews

Fitness to Proceed: Compassion or Prejudice? II HBJ, no. 13,
at 135 (1998).

Case Notes

Chapter, based on model penal code, does not recognize
diminished capacity as a distinct category of mitigation. 73 H. 109, 831 P.2d
512 (1992).

Trial court did not err in permitting prosecution to
cross-examine defendant regarding defendant's non-statements to defendant's
mental examiners where defendant's failure to mention defendant's concerns
regarding aliens was clearly relevant to the question of whether defendant was
being truthful when defendant testified at trial about having those concerns at
the time of the incident, and §704-416 only addresses the admissibility of
defendant's statements, not non-statements; thus, as the introduction of
defendant's non-statements did not violate this chapter, defendant's right to a
fair trial was not prejudiced by admission of the testimony. 116 H. 200, 172
P.3d 512 (2007).

Provisions of chapter apply only to issues raised under the
chapter. 7 H. App. 402, 771 P.2d 899 (1989).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next